Utah statutes.
53B-17-501.   Research park authorized.
The Legislature determines that it is in the public interest of the state of
Utah, its citizens, and commerce to develop a research park in Salt Lake
County upon property conveyed to the University of Utah under patent from the
United States of America dated October 18, 1968.
